tools/src/parsers/test/replace_test_36.xfst
set print-weight ON

regex b -> a::1  || a _ ;
apply up abbb
echo --

regex b -> a::1  \\ a _ ;
apply up abbb
echo --

regex b -> a::1  // a _ ;
apply up abbb
echo --

regex b -> a::1  \/ a _ ;
apply up abbb
